Hawaii statutes.
§454M-8 Powers of commissioner. In
addition to any other acts or conditions provided by law, the commissioner may:

(1) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules, issue declaratory
rulings or informal nonbinding interpretations, and investigate and act upon
written consumer complaints;

(2) Grant, deny, forfeit, renew, reinstate, or
restore the license of any mortgage servicer;

(3) Revoke, suspend, or otherwise limit the license
of any mortgage servicer for any violation of the provisions in this chapter,
or any rule or order of, or agreement with the commissioner;

(4) Report any violation of this chapter or violation
of federal or state law to the Consumer Financial Protection Bureau or other
federal agency having jurisdiction over the licensee;

(5) Investigate and conduct hearings regarding any
violation of this chapter, or any rule or order of or agreement with the
commissioner; and

(6) Do any and all things necessary or incidental to
the exercise of the commissioner's power and duties, including the authority to
conduct contested case proceedings under chapter 91. [L 2009, c 106, pt of §1;
am L 2013, c 92, §5]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next